Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 25 Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperatives
65-25-108. Election of directors by districts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the bylaws may provide that the territory in which a cooperative furnishes service shall be divided into two (2) or more directorate districts for the purpose of:

Having nominated therefrom, at and by district meetings of the members thereof or by any other manner provided for in the bylaws, candidates for directors to be voted upon by the cooperative's members at-large; or

Both nominating and electing directors therefrom at and by district meetings of the members.

The composition of such districts shall have an equitable regard for the number of members served therein, other communities of interest and boundaries that are readily ascertainable. District descriptions need not be contained in the bylaws proper but may be incorporated therein by reference to maps, drawings or other descriptions which, at a cooperative's offices, are accessible to the members for inspection at all reasonable times. To be eligible for election and to serve as a district director, a person must be a member of the cooperative, must reside therein, must receive service from the cooperative, and, in the case of a cooperative having the primary purpose, must receive from the cooperative electric service therein at such person's primary residential abode. In addition to district directors, the bylaws may provide for one (1) or more directors at-large to be nominated in such manner as provided in the bylaws and to be voted upon by the members at-large.

Except as to the minimum and maximum periods prior to a member meeting within which a district meeting shall be held and the notice and quorum requirements therefor, all of which shall be provided for in the bylaws, the board shall fix the date, time and place within a district for holding, and shall adopt the plans, procedures and manner for conducting, directorate district meetings.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B), the bylaws may provide that members may vote for the election of district directors by mail ballot at a directorate district meeting; provided, that the bylaws shall contain a description of the voting procedure, which procedure shall be designed to ensure the integrity of such district director election.

In any electric cooperative organized pursuant to this chapter, that, as reported in the June 30, 1998, TVA 4171 report, served between forty thousand eight hundred (40,800) and forty thousand nine hundred (40,900) customers, and had in service between four thousand fifteen (4,015) and four thousand twenty-five (4,025) miles of power line, no member may vote by mail ballot at a directorate district meeting.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 2000, ch. 746, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-25-202.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 746, § 2, provided that the amendment to (b) by the act shall not apply to any electric cooperative organized pursuant to this chapter, that, as reported in the June 30, 1998, TVA 4171 report, served between forty thousand eight hundred (40,800) and forty thousand nine hundred (40,900) customers and had in service between four thousand fifteen (4,015) and four thousand twenty-five (4,025) miles of power line.

65-25-109. Election of directors by member cooperatives.

The bylaws of a cooperative whose membership consists wholly of one (1) or more other cooperatives shall provide for the manner of nominating and electing its directors, and the bylaws may provide that directors shall be elected from among the members, directors, officers or executive or administrative employees of member cooperatives and/or that its directors shall be either nominated or elected or appointed solely by such member cooperatives' boards.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-209.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-110. Officers of cooperative.

The principal officers of a cooperative shall consist of a president and/or chair, vice president and/or vice chair, secretary, and treasurer, who shall be elected annually by and from the board. No person shall continue to hold any of the above offices after having ceased to be a director. The offices of secretary and of treasurer may be held by the same person.

The board may also elect or appoint such other officers, agents or employees as it shall deem necessary or advisable and shall prescribe their powers and duties.

Subject to the removal of directors as may be provided for in the bylaws, any officer elected or appointed by the board may by the board be removed from such office and a successor elected or appointed whenever the board determines that such action is in the cooperative's best interests.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-210.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-111. Members — Qualifications — Meetings — Voting rights — Terms and conditions.

No person who is not an incorporator of a cooperative shall become a member or a nonmember patron thereof and eligible to receive any service therefrom unless such person shall agree to pay for such service and is otherwise both willing and able to abide by the cooperative's terms and conditions for rendering service.

The terms and conditions of a cooperative, as set forth in its articles of incorporation, bylaws or otherwise, for the admission of members and for the rendering of service to patrons:

Shall be just and reasonable;

Shall not unreasonably discriminate as to its services, or its rates, charges or service rules and regulations, between or among consumers of the same class, or two (2) or more different consumer classes, or two (2) or more localities;

Shall not afford any unreasonable preference or advantage in favor of, or any unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage against, any consumers, consumer classes or localities;

Nor shall membership in or services from a cooperative be denied, conditioned, restricted or terminated arbitrarily, capriciously or without good cause.

No person shall be eligible to be a member of a cooperative whose purposes include the primary purpose unless such person agrees to receive electric service from the cooperative.

Membership in a cooperative shall not be transferable except as may be provided in the bylaws.

The bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications, limitations, rights and obligations in respect of membership, and shall prescribe such in respect of membership admission, resignation, withdrawal, suspension, expulsion and termination.

Special meetings of the members may be called by the board, by that number of directors that is one (1) less than a majority of the directors in office, or by a petition therefor signed by as many as but no fewer than ten percent (10%) of the members. Such meetings shall be held on such date and at such time and place as are fixed by those calling the same or as may otherwise be provided for in the bylaws.

Written or printed notice stating the date, time and place of each meeting of the members and, in the case of a special meeting or of a regular meeting so requiring, the purpose or purposes of the meeting shall be delivered to each member, either personally or by mail:

Except as provided in § 65-25-113(a)(2)(D), not less than ninety (90) days prior to the date of a meeting of the members of a cooperative having a primary purpose and at which the cooperative's dissolution or the sale or lease-sale of all or any substantial portion of its assets and properties devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of such purpose is scheduled to be considered and acted upon;

Not less than sixty (60) days prior to the date of a meeting of the members of a cooperative:

Having a primary purpose and at which the sale or lease-sale of all or any substantial portion of its assets and properties devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of one (1) or more secondary purposes is, solely because its bylaws so require, scheduled to be acted upon by the members; or

Having one (1) or more secondary purposes only and at which the sale or lease-sale of all or any substantial portion of its assets and properties devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of one (1) or more such purposes is scheduled to be considered and acted upon;

Except as provided in § 65-25-113(a)(2)(D), not less than forty-five (45) days prior to the date of a meeting of the members of a cooperative at which a merger or consolidation with one (1) or more other cooperatives is scheduled to be considered and acted upon; or

If subdivision (c)(1)(A), (B) or (C) is not applicable, not less than five (5) nor more than twenty-five (25) days prior to the date of the meeting, unless the bylaws require longer periods.

If mailed, notice shall be deemed to have been delivered if addressed to the member as shown on the cooperative's records and, with postage thereon prepaid, deposited in the United States mail on or prior to the date next following which the minimum period for such notice would begin.

A quorum for the transaction of business at meetings of the members shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (d), be the lesser of two percent (2%) of all members or one hundred (100) members; and, once such a quorum is established, the meeting may proceed to transact all business that may lawfully come before it so long as at least the lesser of one percent (1%) of all members or fifty-one (51) members remain present. In the case of a meeting of the members of a cooperative having a primary purpose and at which the dissolution thereof or the sale or lease-sale of all or any substantial portion of the cooperative's assets and property devoted to and used or useful in achieving the primary purpose is scheduled to be considered and acted upon pursuant, respectively, to § 65-25-113 or § 65-25-120, such quorum requirement shall be and shall remain throughout the meeting ten percent (10%) of all members. If, at any member meeting, less than the required quorum is present to enable the meeting to begin transacting business, or if the quorum requirement for it to continue ceases to exist, a majority of those present may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice.

Each member shall be entitled to one (1) vote on each matter submitted to a vote at member meetings and, if such be the case, at directorate district meetings. A member may not cumulate votes. Voting may be in person, by mail, by proxy, or by any combination thereof, as provided in the bylaws; however, if the bylaws are silent on the manner of voting, voting shall be only in person. If the bylaws provide for voting by proxy or by mail balloting, they may restrict the matters with respect to which they may be voted and in any case they shall prescribe the conditions applying to such voting, including limitations on the number of proxies that may be voted by one (1) member or other person; provided that:

If the bylaws allow for voting by proxy, by mail balloting, or by both, to sell or lease-sell all or any substantial portion of the cooperative's assets and properties or to dissolve the cooperative as an incident of such sale or lease-sale, they shall also allow for voting by proxy or by mail balloting on a proposal to merge or consolidate with one (1) or more other cooperatives;

No one (1) member or other person may vote as proxy for more than three (3) members except in voting on a proposal to:

Sell, lease, lease-sell or otherwise dispose of or encumber all or a substantial portion of a cooperative's assets and properties that are devoted to and used or useful in achieving one (1) or more of its purposes; or

Dissolve a cooperative;

in either of which case the bylaws may provide that one (1) member or other person may vote for up to but no more than ten (10) members;

Provisions for mail voting and return of written ballots shall be such that, although voting by an identifiable member may be reasonably verified, such voting shall be secret and such ballots may, instead of being delivered to the cooperative by mail, be delivered to the cooperative in any other proper manner; and

Printed mail ballots shall be only in such form and content as prescribed by the board and, except as provided in § 65-25-113(a)(3), shall be delivered by the cooperative to the members via the United States mail with, or in any event at the same time as, the mailing of the notice of the member meeting at or with respect to which they will be voted.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-211.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-112. Refunds to patrons.

With respect to the supplying or furnishing of service by a cooperative in pursuance of the primary purpose, the revenues therefrom for any fiscal year, in excess of the amount thereof necessary, to:

Defray expenses of the cooperative, including the operation and maintenance of its facilities during such fiscal year;

Pay interest and principal obligations of the cooperative coming due in such fiscal year;

Finance, or to provide a reserve to finance, the construction or acquisition by the cooperative of additional facilities to the extent determined by the board;

Provide a reasonable reserve for working capital;

Provide a reserve for the payment of indebtedness of the cooperative maturing more than one (1) year after the date of the incurrence of such indebtedness in an amount not less than the total of the interest and principal payments in respect thereof required to be made during the next following fiscal year; and

Provide a fund for education in cooperation and for the dissemination of information concerning the effective use and conservation of electric power and energy and concerning any other services made available by the cooperative;

shall be distributed by the cooperative to patrons in the manner provided for in the bylaws, either:

As patronage refunds prorated in accordance with the patronage of the cooperative by the respective patrons paid for during or with respect to such fiscal year;

By way of general reductions of rates or other charges; or

By any combination of methods in (b)(1)-(3).

With respect to the supplying or furnishing of services in pursuance of one (1) or more secondary purposes, the revenues of a cooperative shall, as separately accounted for and determined for each such service, be first applied as provided in subdivisions (a)(1)-(6) and then distributed to the patrons of each such service in the manner provided for in the bylaws, either:

As patronage refunds prorated in accordance with the patronage of the cooperative by the respective patrons paid for during or with respect to such fiscal year;

By way of general reductions of rates or other charges;

By crediting patrons with having furnished the cooperative capital in amounts equal to the amounts of their patronage not refunded pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) and not used for general reduction of rates or other changes pursuant to subdivision (b)(2), all or any portion of such capital to be redeemable and be retired at such later time as the board in its sole discretion determines that such will not impair the cooperative's financial condition and will be in the cooperative's best interests; or

By any combination of methods in subdivisions (b)(1)-(3).

Nothing contained in subsection (a) or (b) shall be construed to prohibit the payment by a cooperative of all or any part of its indebtedness prior to the date when the same shall become due.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-212.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Attorney General Opinions. A franchise fee paid to a city for use of city rights-of-way is an expense of an electric cooperative that may be reflected in its rates to customers, OAG 00-145, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1147 (9/20/00).

65-25-113. Sale or lease-sale of assets and property.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4), a cooperative having a primary purpose may sell or lease-sell all or any substantial portion of its assets and properties that are devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of such a purpose only if it does so in accordance with subdivisions (a)(1), (2) and (3):

Such sale or lease-sale shall be authorized at a meeting of its members by the affirmative votes of as many as but not fewer than:

A majority of its total members, if the purchase price or other consideration shall be sufficient to discharge or provide for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and, additionally, be equal to or greater than four hundred percent (400%) of the cooperative's net worth;

Fifty-five percent (55%) of its total members, if the purchase price or other consideration shall be sufficient to discharge or provide for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and, additionally, be equal to or greater than three hundred fifty percent (350%) of the cooperative's net worth;

Sixty percent (60%) of its total members, if the purchase price or other consideration shall be sufficient to discharge or provide for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and, additionally, be equal to or greater than three hundred percent (300%) of the cooperative's net worth;

Sixty-five percent (65%) of its total members, if the purchase price or other consideration shall be sufficient to discharge or provide for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and, additionally, be equal to or greater than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the cooperative's net worth;

Seventy percent (70%) of its total members, if the purchase price or other consideration shall be sufficient to discharge or provide for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and, additionally, be equal to or greater than two hundred percent (200%) of the cooperative's net worth;

Seventy-five percent (75%) of its total members, if the purchase price or other consideration shall be sufficient to discharge or provide for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and, additionally, be equal to or greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the cooperative's net worth; or

Eighty percent (80%) of its total members, if the purchase price or other consideration shall be less than sufficient to discharge or provide for the discharge of all of the cooperative's liabilities and, additionally, an amount equal to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the cooperative's net worth;(B) If a sale or lease-sale is of a substantial portion but less than all of the cooperative's such assets and properties, then the net worth shall be that amount that is determined by the ratio of the book value of such assets and properties to the book value of all of the cooperative's such assets and properties; and liabilities to be discharged or to be provided for discharge shall be that amount determined in the same manner, plus such additional amount, if any, required for such discharge or provision for such discharge by any holder of a lien on such assets and properties; provided, that if the cooperative is also engaged in business in pursuance of one (1) or more secondary purposes, the net worth and liabilities referred to in this subsection (a) shall be those related to the cooperative's assets and properties devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of a primary purpose, as separately accounted for in accordance with § 65-25-104(d)(1).

A proposal for such a sale or lease-sale shall, except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(D), first be recommended and submitted to the members by the board, but only after the board's compliance with the following requirements:

It shall first appoint three (3) persons, each of whom is independent of the cooperative and of the other two (2) and each being expert in electric utility property evaluations, and commission them, separately, to study, appraise and evaluate such assets and properties, including their going concern value and the values associated with the right of the members to participate in the ownership and control of the cooperative. Such appraisers shall be instructed to and shall take into account any other factors they may deem relevant in determining the present market value of such assets and properties. Within not more than sixty (60) days after their appointment and commission, each appraiser shall render their highest determination of such present value. The board shall not recommend and submit any proposal that, within one (1) year theretofore or within one (1) year thereafter, it shall have received to purchase or lease-purchase such assets and properties, or, within one (1) year thereafter, make any offer to sell or lease-sell such assets and properties, for a consideration that is less than the highest such determination rendered by the appraisers; nor shall it, following the expiration of one (1) year thereafter, make such a recommendation or offer without, again, first complying with the foregoing requirements;

If, after receiving such appraisals, the board resolves to pursue the matter further, it shall, within not more than sixty (60) days next following such resolution, transmit the appraisals, together with any underlying data and information that may have accompanied them, to every other cooperative that is engaged in business for the primary purpose and invite them to submit competing or alternative proposals, including proposals to merge or consolidate with the cooperative. Such appraisals shall also be accompanied by any proposal for such a sale or lease-sale received by the cooperative within one (1) year prior to the receipt of the last appraisal or received subsequent thereto but prior to the adoption of such resolution; provided, that only the most recent proposal from a person that has made two (2) or more proposals need be so transmitted. Such other cooperatives shall be given at least sixty (60) days within which to submit competing or alternative proposals, and they shall be notified in such transmittal of the actual final date for such submissions;

If, after such date, the board so resolves, it shall recommend and submit to the members a proposal for such a sale or lease-sale or a proposal to merge or consolidate the cooperative with one (1) or more other cooperatives having the primary purpose, accompanying the proposal with verbatim copies of all competing or alternative proposals it has received, together with all of the appraisals and any underlying data and information that may have accompanied such appraisals. Such transmittals shall also be accompanied by a notice of a meeting of the members to consider and act upon the recommended proposal, which meeting may be a special or the regular annual meeting of the members; and

Any three hundred (300) or more members of the cooperative may, over their respective signatures and within not less than forty-five (45) days prior to the date of such member meeting, petition the cooperative to mail to all of the cooperative's members any statement of opposition to the board's recommendation and/or their own recommendation that a competing or alternative proposal, including a proposition to merge or consolidate the cooperative with one (1) or more other cooperatives, or to dissolve it as an incident of their proposal for a sale or lease-sale, be accepted and approved by the members at such meeting, in which event the board shall cause a printed copy of the petition, including the printing of the names of the member signatories thereof, together with a printed copy of the statement, to be transmitted to all of the cooperative's members via the United States mail not less than thirty (30) days prior to such member meeting, with the cost of such printing and mailing to be borne by the cooperative. If so mailed, such petition and statement shall constitute sufficient notice of any such recommended competing or alternative proposal for the same to be considered and acted upon at such meeting, but not until if and after the proposal recommended by the board shall have first been considered and rejected by vote of the members;

If the bylaws provide for voting on such proposals by proxy or by mail balloting, neither proxy forms nor printed ballots with respect to such member meeting shall be mailed or otherwise be made available to, or be capable of being validly executed or voted by, the members sooner than twenty (20) days prior to the date of such meeting, and the bylaws shall contain appropriate provisions assuring that:

If the same is not executed sooner than twenty (20) days prior to the date of such meeting, any otherwise legally sufficient proxy shall be honored by the cooperative, notwithstanding that the board may have prescribed and mailed or otherwise made available the form and content for proxies; and

Only official mail ballots which as to form and content shall have been prescribed by the board shall be allowed, but such ballots shall, clearly and fairly, identify the proposal being recommended by the board and separately, if such be the case, any competing or alternative proposal being recommended by any member-filed petition, and will contain on the front or back thereof clear and accurate instructions as to how the ballots may validly be voted.

Compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) shall not be required if the sale or lease-sale is to be to or with one (1) or more other cooperatives which have the primary purpose and the effect thereof will be essentially the same as if a merger or consolidation were being consummated with such one (1) or more other cooperatives. In such case, the proposal and plan therefor shall be first approved by the cooperative's board and recommended and submitted by the board to the members for their consideration and action at a special member meeting called by the board for that purpose or at the next annual member meeting, the notice of which shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of such proposal and plan; and such a sale or lease-sale shall be approved and authorized if it receives the affirmative votes of a majority of the members of the cooperative; provided, that a proposal and plan for such a sale or lease-sale need not be first approved and recommended by the board if so recommended by three hundred (300) or more members and noticed to all of the members, all as provided for in subdivision (a)(2)(D), in which event the provisions of subdivision (a)(3) shall also be applicable.

A proposal for the sale or lease-sale by a cooperative having the primary purpose and one (1) or more secondary purposes of all or a substantial portion of its assets and properties devoted to and used or useful in the pursuance of one (1) or more such secondary purposes may be approved, authorized and consummated by action of its board only, unless the bylaws require the approval by the members. If the cooperative has secondary purposes only, such proposal shall be first approved by the cooperative's board and recommended and submitted to the members for their consideration and action at a special member meeting called for that purpose or at the next annual member meeting, the notice of which shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the proposal. Such proposal shall be approved and authorized if it receives the affirmative votes of as many as but not fewer than two thirds (2/3) of the members of the cooperative voting thereon.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section:

A substantial portion of a cooperative's assets and properties may be sold solely upon approval and authorization of the board if such sale is in the nature of a forced sale for the reason that the purchaser possesses and otherwise would exercise the legal right to acquire, damage, relocate or destroy the same by condemnation or otherwise without the cooperative's consent;

The board may sell or otherwise dispose of property no longer used or useful in conducting the business of the cooperative; and

No offer to purchase or lease-purchase and no offer to sell or lease-sell all or a substantial portion of a cooperative's assets and properties shall be valid or, if made and accepted, enforceable unless the total consideration to be paid or otherwise furnished therefor, to the extent that the same is in excess of the amounts necessary to discharge or to provide for the discharge of the cooperative's liabilities, or is in excess of that portion of such discharge or provision for discharge that may be a necessary precedent to or incident of a sale or lease-sale of a substantial portion but less than all of such assets and properties, shall be distributed to, or if such be the case allocated and assigned to, the patrons or former patrons of the cooperative in the manner provided for in its articles or bylaws or applicable law.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-213.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-114. Other disposition, lease or encumbrance of assets and properties.

A cooperative having the primary purpose only or one (1) or more secondary purposes only may otherwise dispose of, lease, mortgage or otherwise encumber all or a substantial portion of its assets and properties that are devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of the primary purpose only or of one (1) or more of its secondary purposes only upon the proposal therefor being first approved and recommended by its board and submitted to the members for their consideration and action at a special member meeting called by the board for that purpose or at a regular annual member meeting, the notice of which shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the proposed disposition, lease, mortgage or other encumbrance or by an accurate summary explanation thereof. Such proposal shall be approved and authorized if it receives the affirmative votes of as many as, but not fewer than, two thirds (2/3) of the members voting thereon.

A cooperative having both the primary and one (1) or more secondary purposes may otherwise dispose of, lease, mortgage or otherwise encumber all or a substantial portion of its assets and properties devoted to and used or useful in pursuance of one (1) or more secondary purposes upon the proposal therefor being approved and authorized by its board only, unless its bylaws require the approval of the members.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), or in any other law, or a cooperative's articles of incorporation or bylaws, the board of a cooperative, without authorization or approval of the members thereof, shall have full power and authority to authorize the execution and delivery of a mortgage or mortgages or deed or deeds of trust upon, or the pledging or encumbrancing of, any or all of the assets and properties of the cooperative, whether acquired or to be acquired, and wherever situated, as well as the revenues and income therefrom, all upon such terms and conditions as the board shall determine, to secure any indebtedness of the cooperative to the United States or any instrumentality or agency thereof, or to any corporation or financial institution authorized to assist in the credit and financial needs of cooperatives, or to any other source of finance.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-214.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-115. Directors, officers or members may take acknowledgments.

No person who is authorized to take acknowledgments under the laws of this state shall be disqualified from taking acknowledgments of instruments executed in favor of a cooperative or to which it is a party by reason of being a director, officer or member of such cooperative.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-215.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-116. Recordation of mortgages — Priority.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed by a cooperative which, by its terms, creates a lien upon real and personal property, then owned or after-acquired, and which is recorded as a mortgage of real property in any county in which such property is located or is to be located, shall have the same force and effect as if the mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument were also recorded or filed in the proper office in such county as a mortgage of personal property.

Recordation of any such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument shall cause the lien thereof to attach to all after-acquired property of the mortgagor of the nature therein described as being mortgaged or pledged thereby immediately upon the acquisition of such property by the mortgagor, and such lien shall be superior to all claims of creditors of the mortgagor and purchasers of such property and to all other liens, except liens of prior record and tax liens, affecting such property.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-216.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-117. Consolidation.

Any two (2) or more cooperatives, each of which is hereinafter designated a “consolidating cooperative,” may consolidate into a new cooperative, hereinafter designated the “new cooperative,” by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the consolidation and proposed articles of consolidation to give effect thereto shall be first approved by the board of each consolidating cooperative or by the board or boards of one (1) or more other cooperatives when proposed by at least three hundred (300) members of a cooperative in the manner provided by § 65-25-113(a)(2)(D). The proposed articles of consolidation shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter, and shall state:

The name of each consolidating cooperative, the address of its principal office, and the date of the filing of its articles of incorporation in the office of the secretary of state;

The name of the new cooperative and the address of its principal office;

The names and addresses of the persons who shall constitute the first board of the new cooperative;

The terms and conditions of the consolidation and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner and basis of converting memberships in each consolidating cooperative into memberships in the new cooperative; and

Any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business and affairs of the new cooperative;

The proposition for the consolidation and the proposed articles of consolidation shall then be submitted to a vote of the members of each consolidating cooperative at any annual or special meeting thereof, the notice of which shall set forth full particulars concerning the proposed consolidation. The proposed consolidation and proposed articles of consolidation shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative votes of as many as, but not fewer than, two thirds (2/3) of those members of each consolidating cooperative voting thereon at each such meeting; and

Upon such approvals, articles of consolidation in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each consolidating cooperative by its president or vice president and attested by its secretary, who shall affix the cooperative seal thereto if it has and employs such a seal. The presidents or vice presidents shall also make and annex thereto affidavits stating that the provisions of this section were duly complied with by their respective cooperatives. Such articles of consolidation and affidavits shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-217.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-118. Merger.

One (1) or more cooperatives, each of which is hereinafter designated a “merging cooperative,” may merge into another cooperative, hereinafter designated the “surviving cooperative,” by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the merger and proposed articles of merger to give effect thereto shall be first approved by the board of each merging cooperative, or by the board or boards of one (1) or more other cooperatives when proposed by at least three hundred (300) members of a cooperative in the manner provided by § 65-25-113(a)(2)(D) and by the board of the surviving cooperative. The proposed articles of merger shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter and shall state:

The name of each merging cooperative, the address of its principal office, and the date of the filing of its articles of incorporation in the office of the secretary of state;

The name of the surviving cooperative and the address of its principal office;

A statement that the merging cooperatives elect to be merged into the surviving cooperative;

The terms and conditions of the merger and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner and basis of converting the memberships in the merging cooperative or cooperatives into memberships in the surviving cooperative; and

Any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business and affairs of the surviving cooperative;

The proposition for the merger and the proposed articles of merger shall then be submitted to a vote of the members of each merging cooperative and of the surviving cooperative at any annual or special meeting of the members thereof, the notice of which shall set forth full particulars concerning the proposed merger. The proposed merger and the proposed articles of merger shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative votes of as many as, but not fewer than, two thirds (2/3) of those members of each cooperative voting thereon at each such meeting; and

Upon such approvals, articles of merger in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each such cooperative by its president or vice president and attested by its secretary, who shall affix the cooperative's seal thereto if it has and employs such a seal. The president or vice president shall also make and annex thereto affidavits stating that the provisions of this section were duly complied with by such person's respective cooperative. Such articles of merger and affidavits shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-218.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.